Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 9

Liability of State and Local Governments

Cross References. Immunity from tort liability, §16-120-701 et seq.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2

— Liability of State

Cross References. Immunity of state officers and employees, §19-10-305.

State Claims Commission, §19-10-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1977, No. 543, § 9: Mar. 18, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of State officers and employees are being made defendants in lawsuits seeking damages for their acts or omissions in the performance of their official duties; that in many instances such lawsuits are filed against the estates of such officers or employees; and that it is essential that the State of Arkansas offer protection for its officers or employees against personal liability for performing their official duties, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 113, § 6: Feb. 7, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Judiciary and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Judiciary; that the Arkansas Code 21-9-203 refers to the Joint Interim Committee on Judiciary and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Judiciary; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

21-9-201. Definition.

For the purpose of this subchapter, elected state officials and members of commissions, boards, or other governing bodies of agencies are officers of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 543, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3406.

21-9-202. Jurisdiction of Arkansas State Claims Commission.

The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall have jurisdiction over all claims for indemnification based on a judgment or negotiated settlement in conformity with § 21-9-203.

Proceedings for the recovery of claims and the payment of claims shall be governed by the law governing proceedings before the commission and payment of claims allowed by the commission.

Upon the recommendation of the Attorney General, the State of Arkansas shall have authority to pay damages based on an act or omission by an officer or employee of the State of Arkansas while acting without malice and in good faith within the course and scope of his or her employment and in the performance of his or her official duties, where the amount of damages is determined by negotiated settlement before or after an action has been commenced.

A tort action nominally filed against state employees was in reality an action against the state in violation of the sovereign immunity clause since, under the provisions of this section, the state would be required to pay any judgment obtained against the state employees. Beaulieu v. Gray, 288 Ark. 395, 705 S.W.2d 880 (1986).

Where a suit is brought against an officer or agency with relation to some matter in which defendant represents the state in action and liability, and the state, while not a party to the record, is the real party against which relief is sought so that a judgment for plaintiff, although nominally against the named defendant as an individual or entity distinct from the state, will operate to control the action of the state or subject it to liability, the suit is in effect one against the state and cannot be maintained without its consent. Assaad-Faltas v. University of Ark. for Medical Sciences, 708 F. Supp. 1026 (E.D. Ark. 1989), aff'd without op., 902 F.2d 1572 (8th Cir.), cert. denied, 498 U.S. 905, 111 S. Ct. 271, 112 L. Ed. 2d 227 (1990).

Arkansas did not expressly waive its sovereign immunity by virtue of this section. Burk v. Beene, 948 F.2d 489 (8th Cir. 1991).

Cited: Heigle v. Miller, 332 Ark. 315, 965 S.W.2d 116 (1998); Okruhlik v. Univ. of Ark., 255 F.3d 615 (8th Cir. 2001).

History.

Acts 1977, No. 543, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3405.

21-9-203. Authority to pay damages — Conflict of interest.

The State of Arkansas shall pay actual, but not punitive, damages adjudged by a state or federal court, or entered by such a court as a result of a compromise settlement approved and recommended by the Attorney General, against officers or employees of the State of Arkansas, or against the estate of such an officer or employee, based on an act or omission by the officer or employee while acting without malice and in good faith within the course and scope of his or her employment and in the performance of his or her official duties.

(1)(A)When it has been determined by the Attorney General's office that a conflict of interest for the civil litigation division or any division of the Attorney General's office exists and that therefore the Attorney General's office must decline representation of the officer or employee, the state agency for which the officer or employee is employed is authorized to enter into a contract to hire special counsel to represent the officer or employee under the same conditions that are set out under the provisions of this subchapter and §21-9-304.

The agency will be responsible for the payment of the contract with funds from its maintenance and general operation accounts.

When situations arise in which the Attorney General feels that a conflict of interest exists and therefore must decline representation of the officer or employee, the Attorney General shall prepare a report that he or she shall submit to the House Committee on Judiciary and Senate Committee on Judiciary, in which he or she shall recite the reasons for the conflict of interest and the reasons his or her office declined representation.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 543, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 863, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3401, 12-3402; Acts 1997, No. 113, § 2.

21-9-204. Effect of employee insurance.

Damages payable under this subchapter shall be reduced to the extent that the officer or employee has been indemnified or is entitled to indemnification under any contract of insurance.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 543, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3403.